Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-2,103
Mobile tracking device; use.

(1) A district court may issue a warrant or other order for the installation of a mobile tracking device, and such order may authorize the use of that device within the jurisdiction of the court and outside that jurisdiction if the device is installed in that jurisdiction.

(2) For purposes of this section, mobile tracking device means any:

(a) Electronic or mechanical device which permits the tracking of the movement of a person or object; or

(b) Software program installed on a person's electronic device which permits the tracking of the movement of a person or object.

Laws 1988, LB 899, § 14;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-707.08;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 165;

Laws 2026, LB935, § 44.
July 18, 2026